Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2028.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1074, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1074. Compliance with administrative completeness review time frame A. An agency shall issue a written notice of administrative completeness or deficiencies to an applicant for a license within the administrative completeness review time frame. B. If an agency determines that an application for a license is not administratively complete, the agency shall include a comprehensive list of the specific deficiencies in the written notice provided pursuant to subsection A of this section. If the agency issues a written notice of deficiencies within the administrative completeness time frame, the administrative completeness review time frame and the overall time frame are suspended from the date the notice is issued until the date that the agency receives the missing information from the applicant. C. If an agency does not issue a written notice of administrative completeness or deficiencies within the administrative completeness review time frame, the application is deemed administratively complete. If an agency issues a timely written notice of deficiencies, an application is not complete until the agency receives all requested information. D. Except for an application submitted to the department of water resources pursuant to title 45, A determination by an agency that an application is not administratively complete is an appealable agency action that, which if timely initiated, entitles the applicant to an adjudication on the merits of the administrative completeness of the application. END_STATUTE